tests/datattr.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-optimised-lookup
      Gen: ../khk.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../khk.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] dat.attr with preceding back unrounded vowel":
    байр<n><dat><attr> : байр дахь
    сав<n><dat><attr> : сав дахь
    ах<n><dat><attr> : ах дахь

 "[twol] dat.attr with preceding front unrounded vowel":
    цэцэг<n><dat><attr> : цэцэг дэх
    жил<n><dat><attr> : жил дэх

 "[twol] dat.attr with preceding front rounded vowel":
    өрөө<n><dat><attr> : өрөө дэх
    үе<n><dat><attr> : үе дэх
    зүрх<n><dat><attr> : зүрх дэх

 "[twol] dat.attr with preceding back rounded vowel":
    ногоо<n><dat><attr> : ногоо дахь
    ёс<n><dat><attr> : ёс дахь
    цус<n><dat><attr> : цус дахь
